Washington statutes.
RCW 36.82.160

County road budget—Road budget to be prepared—Estimates of expenditures.

Each county legislative authority, with the assistance of the county road engineer, shall prepare and file with the county auditor on or before the second Monday in August in each year, detailed and itemized estimates of all expenditures required in the county for the ensuing fiscal year. In the preparation and adoption of the county road budget the legislative authority shall determine and budget sums to become available for the following county road purposes: (1) Administration; (2) bond and warrant retirement; (3) maintenance; (4) construction; (5) operation of equipment rental and revolving fund; and (6) such other items relating to the county road budget as may be required by the county road administration board; and the respective amounts as adopted for these several items in the final budget for the ensuing calendar year shall not be altered or exceeded except as by law provided.

[ 1991 c 363 s 88; 1969 ex.s. c 182 s 14; 1963 c 4 s 36.82.160. Prior: 1949 c 156 s 6, part; 1943 c 82 s 7, part; 1937 c 187 s 56, part; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 6450-56, part.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.